Maryland, session 2026, SB0972.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
12–102.
This title applies only in Baltimore City.
12–1603.
(c) The Board may issue:
– 1 –

Ch. 822 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(13) [if the applicant executes a memorandum of understanding with the
Bolton Hill Community Association,] a Class C beer, wine, and liquor license in the 1200
block of Eutaw Place in the 40th alcoholic beverages district IF:
(I) THE APPLICANT EXECUTES A MEMORANDUM OF
UNDERSTANDING WITH THE BOLTON HILL COMMUNITY ASSOCIATION; AND
(II) THE BOARD WAIVES ANY REQUIREMENTS THAT SALES MAY
BE MADE ONLY TO MEMBERS AND GUESTS OF MEMBERS;
(25) a Class B beer, wine, and liquor license for a restaurant on the even
side of the unit block of South Carrollton Avenue in the 40th alcoholic beverages district if:
(i) the applicant executes a memorandum of understanding with the
Hollins Roundhouse Association; and
(ii) the Board waives the minimum seating requirement under item
(1)(ii)2 of this subsection; [and]
(26) a Class C beer, wine, and liquor license on the odd side of the 800 block
of North Howard Street in the 40th alcoholic beverages district if:
(i) the applicant does not convert the license to a different license
class;
(ii) the applicant does not transfer the license to a different location;
(iii) alcoholic beverages are served only to patrons indoors;
(iv) alcoholic beverages sales begin not earlier than 10 a.m. and end
not later than 9 p.m.;
(v) the applicant provides not more than two 12–ounce offerings of
beer, two 6–ounce offerings of wine by the glass, or two 1.5–ounce offerings of liquor for
on–premises consumption by a patron while the patron is provided a barbering service
regulated under Title 4, Subtitle 5 of the Business Occupations and Professions Article;
(vi) the Board waives any requirements that sales can be made only
to members and the guests of members; and
(vii) the applicant executes a memorandum of understanding with the
Mount Vernon – Belvedere Association;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 822
(27) A CLASS B BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR LICENSE FOR A RESTAURANT
ON THE ODD SIDE OF THE 1000 BLOCK OF WEST BALTIMORE STREET IN THE 40TH
ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES DISTRICT IF:
(I) THE APPLICANT EXECUTES A MEMORANDUM OF
UNDERSTANDING WITH THE HOLLINS ROUNDHOUSE ASSOCIATION;
(II) THE APPLICANT DOES NOT TRANSFER THE LICENSE TO A
DIFFERENT LOCATION OR TO ANOTHER PERSON; AND
(III) THE BOARD WAIVES THE MINIMUM SEATING REQUIREMENT
UNDER ITEM (1)(II)2 OF THIS SUBSECTION; AND
(28) A CLASS B BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR LICENSE FOR A RESTAURANT
ON THE EVEN SIDE OF THE 800 BLOCK OF NORTH CHARLES STREET IN THE 40TH
ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES DISTRICT IF:
(I) THE APPLICANT EXECUTES A MEMORANDUM OF
UNDERSTANDING WITH THE MOUNT VERNON – BELVEDERE ASSOCIATION; AND
(II) THE BOARD WAIVES THE MINIMUM SEATING REQUIREMENT
UNDER ITEM (1)(II)2 OF THIS SUBSECTION.
12–2005.
(d) (1) This subsection does not apply to:
(i) a Class B beer and light wine (restaurant) license;
(ii) a Class B beer, wine, and liquor (restaurant) license issued under
§ 12–1603(c)(1)(ii) of this title;
(iii) a Class B–BWL (H–M) license;
(iv) a Class C beer and wine license;
(v) a Class C beer, wine, and liquor license;
(vi) an arena license;
(vii) a marketplace license; or
(viii) a Class M–F (municipal family fun center) license.
– 3 –

Ch. 822 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) For a license holder in the 40th alcoholic beverages district, the hours
of sale for alcoholic beverages may not begin before 10 a.m. or end after 10 p.m.:
(i) within an area bounded:
1. from the intersection of Reisterstown Road and Quantico
Avenue, northwest on Reisterstown Road to the intersection with Wylie Avenue, northeast
on Wylie Avenue to the intersection with Pimlico Road, northwest on Pimlico Road to the
intersection with Dupont Avenue, east on Dupont Avenue to the intersection with Pall Mall
Road, southeast on Pall Mall Road to the intersection with Edgecombe Circle North, east
on Edgecombe Circle North to the intersection with Finney Avenue, south on Finney
Avenue to the intersection with Oakford Avenue, west on Oakford Avenue to the
intersection with Pall Mall Road, southeast on Pall Mall Road to the intersection with
Loyola Northway, southwest on Loyola Northway to the intersection with Pimlico Road,
southeast on Pimlico Road to the intersection with Quantico Avenue, and southwest on
Quantico Avenue to the intersection with Reisterstown Road; and
2. from the intersection of [Millington Avenue] BRUNSWICK
STREET with Wilkens Avenue, northwest on [Millington Avenue] BRUNSWICK STREET
to the intersection with Frederick Avenue, northeast on Frederick Avenue to the
intersection with [West Pratt Street] SOUTH FRANKLINTOWN ROAD, NORTHWEST ON
SOUTH FRANKLINTOWN ROAD TO THE INTERSECTION WITH HOLLINS STREET, east
on [West Pratt Street] HOLLINS STREET to the intersection with South Mount Street,
south on South Mount Street to the intersection with Eagle Street, southwest on Eagle
Street to the intersection with South Smallwood Street, northwest on South Smallwood
Street to the intersection with Wilkens Avenue, and southwest on THE EVEN SIDE OF
Wilkens Avenue to the intersection with [Millington Avenue] BRUNSWICK STREET;
(ii) within the area of West North Avenue between the 1000 block of
West North Avenue and the 3200 block of West North Avenue, inclusive;
(iii) for a license holder within 250 yards in any direction of the area
described in item (ii) of this paragraph; and
(iv) within an area bounded as follows: from the intersection of North
Fulton Avenue with North Avenue, north on North Fulton Avenue to the intersection with
Pennsylvania Avenue, northeast on North Fulton Avenue to the intersection with Druid
Hill Avenue, southeast on Druid Hill Avenue to the intersection with Mosher Street,
southwest on Mosher Street to the intersection with North Carey Street, north on North
Carey Street to the intersection with North Avenue, and west on North Avenue to the
intersection with North Fulton Avenue.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 822
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 5 –